Hawaii statutes.
PART 4.
LIABILITY OF PARTIES

§490:3-401 Signature. (a) A person is
not liable on an instrument unless (i) the person signed the instrument, or
(ii) the person is represented by an agent or representative who signed the
instrument and the signature is binding on the represented person under section
490:3-402.

(b) A signature may be made (i) manually or by
means of a device or machine, and (ii) by the use of any name, including a
trade or assumed name, or by a word, mark, or symbol executed or adopted by a
person with present intention to authenticate a writing. [L 1991, c 118, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next